src/morphology/stems/acronyms.lexc
LEXICON Acronym
acros ;
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё > acr2 ;

АВМ+Sem/Org:АВМ acrotag ;
АССР+Sem/Org:АССР acrotag ;
БАМ+Sem/Org:БАМ acrotag ;
БТИ+Sem/Org:БТИ acrotag ; !БТИ-ень
ВДНХ:ВДНХ acrotag ;
ВИМ:ВИМ acrotag ;
ВЛКСМ:ВЛКСМ acrotag ;
ВУЗ:ВУЗ acrotag ;
ВЦИК:ВЦИК acrotag ;
ВЦСПС:ВЦСПС acrotag ;
ВЧК:ВЧК acrotag ;
ГАИ:ГАИ acrotag ;
ГДР:ГДР acrotag ;
ГЗС:ГЗС acrotag ;
ГИХЛ:ГИХЛ acrotag ;
ГПУ:ГПУ acrotag ;
ГЭС:ГЭС acrotag ;
ДОК:ДОК acrotag ;
ДОП:ДОП acrotag ;
ДОСААФ:ДОСААФ acrotag ;
ДПСС:ДПСС acrotag ;
ЗАГС:ЗАГС acrotag ;
ЗИЛ:ЗИЛ acrotag ;
КЛМ:КЛМ acrotag ;
КНР:КНР acrotag ;
КПЗ:КПЗ acrotag ;
КПСС:КПСС acrotag ;
МАЗ:МАЗ acrotag ;
МАССР:МАССР acrotag ;
МВД:МВД acrotag ;
МТС:МТС acrotag ;
МТФ:МТФ acrotag ;
НЭП:НЭП acrotag ;
ОГПУ:ОГПУ acrotag ;
ОК:ОК acrotag ;
ОМ:ОМ acrotag ;
ОНО:ОНО acrotag ;
ОТК:ОТК acrotag ;
ОТФ:ОТФ acrotag ;
ПК:ПК acrotag ;
ПС:ПС acrotag ;
ПТО:ПТО acrotag ;
ПТР:ПТР acrotag ;
РИК:РИК acrotag ;
РКП:РКП acrotag ;
РОНО:РОНО acrotag ;
РОСТА:РОСТА acrotag ;
РСДРП:РСДРП acrotag ;
РСФСР:РСФСР acrotag ;
РТС:РТС acrotag ;
РУЖД:РУЖД acrotag ;
СД:СД acrotag ;
СДРП:СДРП acrotag ;
СНК:СНК acrotag ;
СССР:СССР acrotag ;
США:США acrotag ;
ТОЗ:ТОЗ acrotag ;
ТЭЦ:ТЭЦ acrotag ;
УНР:УНР acrotag ;
УОНО:УОНО acrotag ;
ФЗО:ФЗО acrotag ;
ФРГ:ФРГ acrotag ;
ЦК:ЦК acrotag ;
ЦСУ:ЦСУ acrotag ;
ЧК:ЧК acrotag ;
ШКМ:ШКМ acrotag ;
ЭВКШ:ЭВКШ acrotag ;


LEXICON acr2
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё > acr3 ;

LEXICON acr3
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё > acr4 ;
acrotag ;

LEXICON acr4
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё > acr5 ;
acrotag ;

LEXICON acr5
< А|Б|В|Г|Д|Е|Ж|З|И|Й|К|Л|М|Н|О|П|Р|С|Т|У|Ф|Х|Ц|Ч|Ш|Щ|Ъ|Ы|Ь|Э|Ю|Я|Ё > acrotag ;
acrotag ;

LEXICON acrotag
+N+ACR: ACRONDELIMITER ;

LEXICON acros
см³ acrotag ;
°C acrotag ;
K acrotag ; ! Kelvin, Latin letter K
